Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 4. Certain Offenses Relating to Minors.

Sec. 28.35.280.
Minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol.

A person who is at least 14 years of age but not yet 21 years of age commits the offense of minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol if the person operates or drives a motor vehicle or operates an aircraft or a watercraft after having consumed any quantity of alcohol. A peace officer who has probable cause to believe that a person has committed the offense of minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol may

place the person under arrest;

request that the person submit to a chemical test or tests of the person’s breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of the person’s blood or breath; and

transport the person to a location at which a chemical or other test authorized under (2) of this subsection may be administered.

If a chemical test under this section reveals any alcohol concentration within the person’s blood or breath, the person shall be cited for violating this section and then released unless there is a lawful reason for further detention. A person who is 18 years of age or older shall be released on the person’s own recognizance. A person who is under the age of 18 shall be released to a parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

A person who is cited for violating this section shall be advised by a peace officer that it is unlawful under AS

28.35.290

for the person to operate a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft during the 24 hours following the issuance of the citation.

The offense of a minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol is an infraction, and, if the minor

has not been previously convicted under this section, AS

28.35.285

, or

28.35.290

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $500; and

period of community work service of not less than 20 hours nor more than 40 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted once under this section, AS

28.35.285

, or

28.35.290

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,000; and

period of community work service of not less than 40 hours nor more than 60 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted two or more times under this section, AS 28.35.285, or 28.35.290, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,500; and

period of community work service of not less than 60 hours nor more than 80 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service.

In this section,

“operate an aircraft” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030(w)

;

“operate a watercraft” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030(w)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (e), “AS

28.35.030(r)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(o)

” to reflect the 2002 relettering of AS

28.35.030(o)

.

In 2004, in subsection (e), “AS

28.35.030(t)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(r)

” to reflect the 2004 relettering of AS

28.35.030(r)

as AS

28.35.030(t)

.

In 2008, in subsection (e), “AS

28.35.030(u)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(t)

” to reflect the 2008 relettering of AS

28.35.030(t)

as AS

28.35.030(u)

.

In 2019, in subsection (e), “ AS

28.35.030(w)

” was substituted for “ AS

28.35.030(u)

” to reflect the 2019 relettering of
AS

28.35.030(u)

as
AS

28.35.030(w)

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 5,
ch. 128, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 repeal and reenactment of (d) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004”, and that “[r]eferences to prior convictions under [that section] apply to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”

Sec. 28.35.285.
Minor’s refusal to submit to chemical test.

If a person under arrest for minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol refuses the request of a peace officer to submit to a chemical test or tests of the person’s breath authorized under AS

28.35.031(a)

and

28.35.280(a)

, after being advised by the officer that the refusal will result in the denial or revocation of the driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, that the refusal may be used against the person in a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of an act alleged to have been committed by the person while operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol, and that the refusal is a violation, a chemical test may not be given.

A person who is cited for violating this section shall be advised by a peace officer that it is unlawful under AS

28.35.290

for the person to operate a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft during the 24 hours following the issuance of the citation.

The refusal of a minor to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.35.031(a)

and

28.35.280(a)

is admissible evidence in a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of an act alleged to have been committed by the person while operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol.

Refusal to submit to a chemical test or tests of the person’s breath requested under AS

28.35.280

is an infraction, and, if the minor

has not been previously convicted under this section, AS

28.35.280

, or

28.35.290

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $500; and

period of community work service of not less than 20 hours nor more than 40 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted once under this section, AS 28.35.280, or

28.35.290

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,000; and

period of community work service of not less than 40 hours nor more than 60 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted two or more times under this section, AS 28.35.280, or 28.35.290, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,500; and

period of community work service of not less than 60 hours nor more than 80 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service.

History.

(§ 13 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5,
ch. 128, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 repeal and reenactment of (d) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004”, and that “[r]eferences to prior convictions under [that section] apply to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”

Sec. 28.35.290.
Driving during the 24 hours after being cited for alcohol or breath test offenses.

A person who has been cited for minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol under AS

28.35.280

or for refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath under AS

28.35.285

may not operate a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft during the 24 hours following issuance of the citation.

Operating a motor vehicle during the 24 hours after being cited for minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol or for minor’s refusal to submit to a chemical test is an infraction, and, if the minor

has not been previously convicted under this section, AS

28.35.280

, or

28.35.285

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $500; and

period of community work service of not less than 20 hours nor more than 40 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted once under this section, AS

28.35.280

, or

28.35.285

, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,000; and

period of community work service of not less than 40 hours nor more than 60 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service;

has been previously convicted two or more times under this section, AS 28.35.280, or 28.35.285, upon conviction, the court shall impose a

fine of $1,500; and

period of community work service of not less than 60 hours nor more than 80 hours; the community work service under this subparagraph must be related to education about or prevention or treatment of misuse of alcohol if opportunities are available for that type of work service in the community; if such opportunities are not available, the court shall make other provisions for the work service.

In this section,

“operate an aircraft” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030(w)

;

“operate a watercraft” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030(w)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 128 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (c), “AS

28.35.030(r)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(o)

” to reflect the 2002 relettering of AS

28.35.030(o)

.

In 2004, in subsection (c), “AS

28.35.030(t)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(r)

” to reflect the 2004 relettering of AS

28.35.030(r)

as AS

28.35.030(t)

.

In 2008, in subsection (c), “AS

28.35.030(u)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(t)

” to reflect the 2008 relettering of AS

28.35.030(t)

as AS

28.35.030(u)

.

In 2019, in subsection (c), “AS

28.35.030(w)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(u)

” to reflect the 2019 relettering of AS

28.35.030(u)

as AS

28.35.030(w)

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 5,
ch. 128, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 repeal and reenactment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004”, and that “[r]eferences to prior convictions under [that section] apply to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”